Georgia, session 2025_26, HB756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Chatham Area Transit Authority, approved March 28, 1986
(Ga. L. 1986, p. 5082), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 11, 2012
(Ga. L. 2012, p. 5296), is amended by revising Section 2.2 as follows:
"SECTION 2.2.
Membership and terms of office.
(a)(1) The authority membership in office on June 30, 2025, shall vacate their offices,
and such offices shall be abolished as of that date.
H. B. 756 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 47 3708S
(2) On July 1, 2025, the authority shall be governed by a new board that shall consist
of up to 11 members as follows:
(A) Two members of the Board of Commissioners of Chatham County appointed by
such board;
(B) One member of the Board of Aldermen of the City of Savannah appointed by such
board;
(C) One member of the City Council of the City of Port Wentworth appointed by such
council if such city exercises an option to participate under this Act;
(D) One member of the City Council of the City of Garden City appointed by such
council;
(E) One member appointed by the Savannah-Georgia Convention Center Authority;
(F) One member appointed by the Board of Commissioners of Chatham County who
shall be a person with a disability;
(G) One member appointed by the Board of Aldermen of the City of Savannah who
shall be a resident of said city;
(H) One member appointed by the Chatham County legislative delegation who shall
be a member or employee of a business advocacy organization;
(I) One member appointed by the Chatham County legislative delegation who shall be
a member or employee of a tourism advocacy organization; and
(J) One member appointed by the Chatham County legislative delegation who shall be
a resident of Chatham County.
(3)(A) Members of the authority appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (E), (H), (I), and
(J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall serve two-year terms of office and until
their successors are appointed and qualified.
(B) Members of the authority appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (F) and (G) of
paragraph (2) of this subsection shall serve four-year terms of office and until their
successors are appointed and qualified.
H. B. 756 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 47 3708S
(C) Members of the authority appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through (D) of
paragraph (2) of this subsection shall serve terms concurrent with their elective office,
unless otherwise removed from the authority by their relevant appointing authority.
(4) Except for the members appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (B) through (D) and
(G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection who are required to be residents or elected
officials of a designated municipality, members of the authority may reside in any part
of incorporated or unincorporated Chatham County.
(5) Elected or appointed officers or officials or employees of any county, municipality,
political subdivision, local authority, or state authority who meet the residency
requirements provided for in this subsection may serve as members of the authority.
(6) The board established pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection shall in all matters
be the successor to the authority membership abolished in paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
(b) For the purposes of subsection (a) of this Section, the Chatham County legislative
delegation shall be composed of all senators and representatives in the General Assembly
whose districts are wholly or partially in Chatham County.
(c) Any member of the authority who has served for two consecutive full terms of office
shall not be eligible for reappointment as a member of the authority until two years have
elapsed after such member has vacated his or her seat on the authority.
(d)(1) A member's seat on the authority shall be forfeited if:
(A) The member lacks at any time the qualifications for membership on the authority
provided by this Act;
(B) The member is convicted of any felony or other crime involving moral turpitude,
regardless of the sentence imposed; or
(C) The member fails to attend, without being excused by the authority:
(i) Four consecutive regular meetings of the authority; or
H. B. 756 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 47 3708S
(ii) Fifty percent of the regular and special called meetings of the authority in any one
fiscal year.
(2) If the seat of a member of the authority becomes vacant because of death, resignation,
or forfeiture as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, or for any other reason, such
vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner that an appointment is
made for a full term as provided in this section.
(e) A majority of the members of the authority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of business. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all
the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.
(f) No member of the authority shall vote on any matter before the authority in which such
member has a direct or indirect financial interest. Except for compensation received as an
employee, no employee of the authority shall have any direct or indirect financial interest
in or profit or benefit from any contract, work, or business of the authority or in the sale,
lease, or purchase of any property to or from the authority.
(g) Members of the authority, including the chairperson, shall not be entitled to
compensation for their service on the board but shall be entitled to reimbursement for
actual and reasonable expenses incurred on authority business, provided that such expenses
were authorized in advance of being incurred.
(h) The members of the authority shall elect from among their membership a chairperson
and a vice chairperson. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall each hold such offices
for a term of two years. The chairperson shall preside over meetings of the authority. The
vice chairperson shall act in the absence or inability of the chairperson. Regular meetings
of the authority shall be held monthly, with the time, place, and notice of such meetings to
be fixed by the authority. All meetings shall be conducted in accordance with Robert's
Rules of Order, unless the authority adopts other rules. All motions, resolutions, and other
proceedings of the authority and all documents in its possession shall be public records and
open to public inspection as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A.
H. B. 756 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 47 3708S
(i) The chairperson of the authority shall be entitled to vote on any matter coming before
the authority."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2025.
SECTION 3.
100 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 756 (SUB)
- 5 -